docker/elastic/sk/hunspell/sk_SK/sk_SK.aff
SFX Y Y 158
SFX Y   e           ejšie      e
SFX Y   e           ejšia      e
SFX Y   e           ejší       e
SFX Y   e           ejšieho    e
SFX Y   e           ejšej      e
SFX Y   e           ejších     e
SFX Y   e           ejšiemu    e
SFX Y   e           ejšej      e
SFX Y   e           ejším      e
SFX Y   e           ejšiu      e
SFX Y   e           ejších     e
SFX Y   e           ejšom      e
SFX Y   e           ejším      e
SFX Y   e           ejšou      e
SFX Y   e           ejšími     e
SFX Y   i           e          i
SFX Y   i           a          i
SFX Y   i           eho        i
SFX Y   i           ej         i
SFX Y   i           ich        i
SFX Y   i           emu        i
SFX Y   i           im         i
SFX Y   i           u          i
SFX Y   i           om         i
SFX Y   i           ou         i
SFX Y   i           imi        i
SFX Y   0           ý          m
SFX Y   0           í          m
SFX Y   0           é          m
SFX Y   0           á          m
SFX Y   0           ého        m
SFX Y   0           ej         m
SFX Y   0           ých        m
SFX Y   0           ému        m
SFX Y   0           ej         m
SFX Y   0           ým         m
SFX Y   0           ú          m
SFX Y   0           om         m
SFX Y   0           ou         m
SFX Y   0           ými        m
SFX Y   0           a          in     # matkin
SFX Y   0           o          in
SFX Y   0           i          in
SFX Y   0           e          in
SFX Y   0           ho         in
SFX Y   0           ej         in
SFX Y   0           ých        in
SFX Y   0           mu         in
SFX Y   0           ým         in
SFX Y   0           u          in
SFX Y   0           om         in
SFX Y   0           ou         in
SFX Y   0           ými        in
SFX Y   0           a          ov     # otcov
SFX Y   0           o          ov
SFX Y   0           i          ov
SFX Y   0           e          ov
SFX Y   0           ho         ov
SFX Y   0           ej         ov
SFX Y   0           ých        ov
SFX Y   0           mu         ov
SFX Y   0           ým         ov
SFX Y   0           u          ov
SFX Y   0           om         ov
SFX Y   0           ou         ov
SFX Y   0           ými        ov
SFX Y   y           e          y
SFX Y   y           a          y
SFX Y   y           i          y
SFX Y   y           o          y
SFX Y   y           eho        y
SFX Y   y           ej         y
SFX Y   y           ych        y
SFX Y   y           emu        y
SFX Y   y           ym         y
SFX Y   y           u          y
SFX Y   y           om         y
SFX Y   y           ou         y
SFX Y   y           ymi        y
SFX Y   y           ejšie      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejšia      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejší       [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejšieho    [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejšej      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejších     [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejšiemu    [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejšej      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejším      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejšiu      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejších     [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejšom      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejším      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejšou      [klntv]y
SFX Y   y           ejšími     [klntv]y
SFX Y   ý           í          ý
SFX Y   ý           é          ý
SFX Y   ý           á          ý
SFX Y   ý           ého        ý
SFX Y   ý           ej         ý
SFX Y   ý           ých        ý
SFX Y   ý           ému        ý
SFX Y   ý           ej         ý
SFX Y   ý           ým         ý
SFX Y   ý           ú          ý
SFX Y   ý           om         ý
SFX Y   ý           ou         ý
SFX Y   ý           ými        ý
SFX Y   ý           ejšie      [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           ejšia      [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           ejší       [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           ejšieho    [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           ejšej      [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           ejších     [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           ejšiemu    [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           ejšej      [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           ejším      [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           ejšiu      [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           ejších     [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           ejšom      [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           ejším      [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           ejšou      [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           ejšími     [kntv]ý
SFX Y   ý           šie        [dh]ý
SFX Y   ý           šia        [dh]ý
SFX Y   ý           ší         [dh]ý
SFX Y   ý           šieho      [dh]ý
SFX Y   ý           šej        [dh]ý
SFX Y   ý           ších       [dh]ý
SFX Y   ý           šiemu      [dh]ý
SFX Y   ý           šej        [dh]ý
SFX Y   ý           ším        [dh]ý
SFX Y   ý           šiu        [dh]ý
SFX Y   ý           ších       [dh]ý
SFX Y   ý           šom        [dh]ý
SFX Y   ý           ším        [dh]ý
SFX Y   ý           šou        [dh]ý
SFX Y   ý           šími       [dh]ý
SFX Y   á           é          á     # gazdiná
SFX Y   á           ej         á
SFX Y   á           ú          á
SFX Y   á           ou         á
SFX Y   á           ých        [^iv]ná
SFX Y   á           ým         [^iv]ná
SFX Y   á           ými        [^iv]ná
SFX Y   ná          ien        [^i]ná
SFX Y   iná         ín         iná
SFX Y   á           ách        iná     # švarginá
SFX Y   á           ám         iná
SFX Y   á           ami        iná
SFX Y   á           ách        vná     # kráľovná
SFX Y   á           ám         vná
SFX Y   á           ami        vná
SFX Y   0           ho         é     # skladné
SFX Y   0           mu         é
SFX Y   é           om         é 
SFX Y   é           ým         é
SFX Y   é           ých        é
SFX Y   é           ými        é

SFX I Y 15
SFX I   í           ia         í
SFX I   í           ie         í
SFX I   í           ieho       í
SFX I   í           ej         í
SFX I   0           ch         í
SFX I   í           iemu       í
SFX I   0           m          í
SFX I   í           iu         í
SFX I   í           om         í
SFX I   í           ou         í
SFX I   0           mi         í
SFX I   í           o          í
SFX I   í           ejší       í
SFX I   í           ejšia      í
SFX I   í           ejšie      í

SFX P Y 12
SFX P   0           jšie       e
SFX P   í           ia         í
SFX P   í           ie         í
SFX P   í           ieho       í
SFX P   í           ej         í
SFX P   0           ch         í
SFX P   í           iemu       í
SFX P   0           m          í
SFX P   í           iu         í
SFX P   í           om         í
SFX P   í           ou         í
SFX P   0           mi         í
